District of Columbia statutes.
38-2304

Report of Convention of American Instructors of the Deaf.

The Convention of American Instructors of the Deaf shall report to Congress, through the President of Gallaudet University at Washington, District of Columbia, such portions of its proceedings and transactions as its officers shall deem to be of general public interest and value concerning the education of the deaf.

Jan. 26, 1897, 29 Stat. 499, ch. 94, § 4
Mar. 4, 1911, 36 Stat. 1422, ch. 285
June 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 265, ch. 324, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-1804.
1973 Ed., § 31-1024.
“Gallaudet University” was substituted for “Gallaudet College” pursuant to § 38-2401.01. “Gallaudet College” had previously been substituted for “Columbia Institution for the Deaf” near the beginning of this section, pursuant to former § 38-2305.